test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-a_23_pimia_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Var.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ei tsekattu: # Noun 'mørkt'
     pimmee+A+Sg+Nom: pimiä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Gen: pimiän
     pimmee+A+Sg+Par: pimiää
     pimmee+A+Sg+Tra: pimiäksi
     pimmee+A+Sg+Abe: pimiättä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ine: pimiässä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ela: pimiästä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ill: pimihään
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ade: pimiällä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Abl: pimiältä
     pimmee+A+Sg+All: pimiälle
     pimmee+A+Sg+Ess: pimiännä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Nom: pimiät
     pimmee+A+Pl+Gen: pimeitten
     pimmee+A+Pl+Par: pimeitä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Tra: pimeiksi
     pimmee+A+Pl+Abe: pimeittä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ine: pimeissä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ela: pimeistä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ill: pimeissiin
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ade: pimeilä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Abl: pimeiltä
     pimmee+A+Pl+All: pimeile
     pimmee+A+Pl+Ess: pimeinä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Com: pimeine

     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+Nom: pimiämpi
     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+Gen: pimiämmän
     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+Par: pimiämpää
     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+Tra: pimiämmäksi
     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+Abe: pimiämmättä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+Ine: pimiämmässä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+Ela: pimiämmästä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+Ill: pimiämphään
     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+Ade: pimiämmälä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+Abl: pimiämmältä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+All: pimiämmäle
     pimmee+A+Sg+Comp+Ess: pimiämpänä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Nom: pimiämmät
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Gen: pimiämmitten
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Par: pimiämpiä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Tra: pimiämmiksi
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Abe: pimiämmittä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Ine: pimiämmissä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Ela: pimiämmistä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Ill: pimiämphiin
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Ade: pimiämmilä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Abl: pimiämmiltä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+All: pimiämmile
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Ess: pimiämpinä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Comp+Com: pimiämpine

     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Nom: pimein
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Gen: pimeimän
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Par: pimeintä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Tra: pimeimäksi
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Abe: pimeimättä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Ine: pimeimässä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Ela: pimeimästä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Ill: pimeimphään
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Ade: pimeimällä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Abl: pimeimältä
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+All: pimeimälle
     pimmee+A+Sg+Superl+Ess: pimeimpännä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Nom: pimeimät
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Gen: pimeimitten
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Par: pimeimpiä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Tra: pimeimiksi
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Abe: pimeimittä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Ine: pimeimissä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Ela: pimeimistä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Ill: pimeimphiin
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Ade: pimeimillä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Abl: pimeimiltä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+All: pimeimille
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Ess: pimeimpinnä
     pimmee+A+Pl+Superl+Com: pimeimpinne
